District of Columbia statutes.
42-3605

Default judgment.

The Court shall not enter a default judgment to evict a tenant or occupant who has failed to plead or otherwise defend unless, based upon evidence presented by the plaintiff, the Court determines that the rental unit is a drug haven or nuisance.

History

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1306, 47 DCR 6308

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1306 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1306 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).